Utah statutes.
78B-2-309.   Within six years -- Mesne profits of real property -- Instrument in writing.

An action may be brought within six years:

(1)  for the mesne profits of real property;

(2)  upon any contract, obligation, or liability founded upon an instrument in writing, except those mentioned in Section 78B-2-311; and

(3)  to recover fire suppression costs or other damages caused by wildland fire.

